Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5862XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 2028 Section 1. PUBLIC SAFETY ââ FIRE FIGHTER TRAINING AND 1 CERTIFICATION. By January 1, 2027, the department of public 2 safety shall revise the rules relating to fire fighter training 3 and certification to provide that a person who committed any 4 crime as an adult that resulted in the requirement that the 5 person be listed on a sex offender registry, and the person is 6 currently a registered sex offender, shall not be certified 7 as a fire fighter, and shall not serve as a noncertified fire 8 fighter or volunteer fire fighter. 9